Washington statutes.
RCW 19.390.080

Penalty for noncompliance.

Any person who fails to comply with any provision of this chapter is liable to the state for a civil penalty of not more than two hundred dollars per day for each day during which such person is in violation of this chapter.

[ 2019 c 267 s 8.]